test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_pohted_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - pohteđ: # MLO checked
    pohteđ+V+Inf: pohteđ
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povtám
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: povtáh
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pohtá
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pohteen
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pohtevettee
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pohtev
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pohtep
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pohtevetteđ
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pohteh
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puhtim
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: puhtih
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puuvtij
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: puvttijm
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: puvttijd
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: puvttijn
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: puuvtijm
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: puuvtijd
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puhtii
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: povtáččim
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: povtáččih
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: povtáččij
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: povtáččáim
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: povtáččáid
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: povtáččáin
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: povtáččijm
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: povtáččijd
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: povtáččii
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pohteem
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pohteeh
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: puuvtiš
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: puvtižeen
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: puuvtišvettee
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: puvtižává
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: puvtižep
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: puuvtišvetteđ
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: puvtižeh
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: povte
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: povtos
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pohtoon
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pohtee
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pohtoos
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pohtoop
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pohteđ
    pohteđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pohtoos
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: povte
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pohtám
    pohteđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: povtáččii
    pohteđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: povtáá
    pohteđ+V+PrsPrc: pohtee
    pohteđ+V+PrfPrc: pohtám
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Nom: pohtem
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Ess: pohtemin
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Loc: pohtemist
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Ill: pohtemân
    pohteđ+V+Actio+Com: povtedijn
    pohteđ+V+VAbess: povtehánnáá

  Verb - kopseđ: # MLO: checked
    kopseđ+V+Inf: kopseđ
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kopsám
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kopsá
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kopseen
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kopsevetteđ
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kopseh
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kupsim
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuupsij
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kopse
    kopseđ+V+PrfPrc: kopsám

  Verb - toideđ: # MLO checked 
    toideđ+V+Inf: toideđ
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toidám
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: toidáh 
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toidá
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: toideen
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: toidevettee
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: toidev
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: toidep
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: toidevetteđ
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: toideh
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tuidim
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tuidih
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuuidij
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tuidijm
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tuidijd
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tuidijn
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tuuidijm
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tuuidijd
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuidii
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: toidáččim
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: toidáččih
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: toidáččij
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: toidáččáim
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: toidáččáid
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: toidáččáin
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: toidáččijm
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: toidáččijd
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: toidáččii
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: toideem
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: toideeh
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tuuidiš 
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tuidižeen
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: tuuidišvettee
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tuidižává
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tuidižep
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: tuuidišvetteđ
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tuidižeh

    toideđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: toide
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: toidos
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Du1: toidoon
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Du2: toidee
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Du3: toidoos
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: toidoop
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: toideđ
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: toidoos
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toide
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: toidám
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: toidáččii
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: toidáá
    toideđ+V+PrsPrc: toidee 
    toideđ+V+PrfPrc: toidám
    toideđ+V+Actio+Nom: toidem
    toideđ+V+Actio+Ess: toidemin
    toideđ+V+Actio+Loc: toidemist
    toideđ+V+Actio+Ill: toidemân
    toideđ+V+Actio+Com: toidedijn
    toideđ+V+VAbess: toidehánnáá
